src/morfo.ES.foma
# Spanish Morphological Analyzer
# ==============================
# This is the component of the pipeline that analyzes Spanish words based on a
# number of open-class word lists, present in the directory `data/ES/OP/`, and
# also closed-class but variant words.
#
# The tagset is multivalued, that is, every word can get more than one tag.
# Every word gets at least one tag, that of the part of speech. Open class words
# get the lexeme, while closed class words don't. The extra tags for all words
# are different morphological pieces of information, encoded by the different
# morphemes. They are prepended to the part of speech in arbitrary ordering.

# Definitions
# -----------

# Common morpheme for plural with `s`
define SPlural ["+Sing":0 | "+Plural":[%^ s]];
# Variant morpheme for gender
define OAGen ["+Masc":o | "+Fem":a];
# Morpheme for "Masculine by default" words, the feminine gender is the morpheme `a`
define AGen ["+Masc":0 | "+Fem":[%^ a]];
# Common morpheme set for Spanish words: gender and number
define GenNum AGen SPlural;

# Consonants
define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z];
# Vowels
define Vocal [a|e|i|o|u];

# Determinantes
# =============
# Determiners, some of them are listed in the closed class dictionaries. Those
# with morphological information, even though closed class, are analyzed here to
# extact the corresponding tags. As most function words, they are highly irregular.

# Articulos
# ---------
# Articles can be definite or indefinite, but all have gender and number
# information.

# Definite articles
define Determinado "+Masc":{el} "+Sing":0
                 | "+Masc":{lo} "+Plural":s
                 | "+Neut":{lo} "+Sing":0
                 | "+Fem":{la} SPlural
                 ;
# Indefinite articles
define Indeterminado "+Masc":{un} ["+Sing":0 | "+Plural":{os}]
                   | "+Fem":{una} SPlural
                   ;
define Articulo Determinado "+ArtD":0
              | Indeterminado "+ArtI":0
              ;

# Demostrativos
# -------------
# Demonstrative determinants are more regular, but still have the neuter gender
# inherited from latin and lost elsewhere in the language.
define DDemostrativo 0:{est} [ ["+Masc" "+Sing"]:e
                          | "+Fem":a SPlural
                          | "+Neut":o
                          | "+Masc":o "+Plural":s
                          ] "+Dem":0;

# Numerales
# ---------
# Numbers are defined here, and their letter-written ordinal variants are also loaded
# here, since they can have gender and number inflection.
define Digito [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define Numero [Digito* [(%.|%,) Digito+]*] "+Numeral":0;
define Ordinal {primer} [OAGen SPlural | "+Sing":0]
             | {tercer} [OAGen SPlural | "+Sing":0]
             | @txt"data/ES/OP/Num.txt" GenNum
             ;

# The two contractions of spanish, `de+el` (del) and `a+el` (al) are listed here
# with the determinants, but they have a special tag for identification.
define Determinante [ Articulo
                    | Numero
                    | DDemostrativo
                    | Ordinal "+Ord":0
                    ] "+Det":0
                  | ["DE+EL"]:{del}
                  | ["A+EL"]:{al}
                  ;

# Pronombres
# ==========
# Pronouns are a very important part of Spanish. They carry gender and number
# information, and also case information not present in other parts of the
# language morphology. They are bastardizations from latin pronouns, already
# irregular, so they are highly irregular.

# Personales
# ----------
# Personal pronouns can have any of the Nominative, Accusative (ObjD) and Dative
# (ObjI) cases. They can also be of neuter gender. First and second person
# singular don't encode gender.
define Personal ["+1a":0 "+Sing":0 ["+Nom":{yo} | "+ObjD":{mí} | "+ObjI":{me}]]
              | ["+2a":0 "+Sing":0 ["+Nom":{tu} | "+ObjD":{tí} | "+ObjI":{te}]]
              | ["+3a":0 "+Masc":0 "+Sing":0 [0:{él} | "+Obj":{le} SPlural]]
              | ["+3a":0 "+Neut":0 "+Sing":0 [0:{ello} | "+Obj":{lo} SPlural]]
              | ["+3a":0 "+Fem":0 [0:{ella} | "+Obj":{la}] SPlural]
              | ["+1a":n | "+2a":v] 0:{osotr} OAGen "+Plural":s
              | ["+1a":n | "+2a":0] "+Obj":{os}
              | ["+3a" "+Masc" "+Plural"]:{ellos}
              ;
# Posesivos
# ---------
# Possesive pronouns don't have gender information for the bound object, but
# they optionally add it for the modified one.
define Posesivo [ ["+1a" "+Sing"]:{mi} OAGen
                | ["+2a" "+Sing"]:{tu} (0:y OAGen)
                | "+3a":{su} (0:y OAGen)
                | ["+1a":n | "+2a":v] 0:{uestr} OAGen
                ] ("+PlurObj":s);


# Demostrativos
# -------------
# Demonstrative pronouns are hard to distinguish from their counterpart
# determinants with spelling only. In the past, they were distinguished by the
# ortographical accent (tilde) (é), but the Real Academia dropped that rule a
# few years back.
define PDemostrativo 0:[[é|e] s t] [ ["+Masc" "+Sing"]:e
                          | "+Fem":a SPlural
                          | "+Neut":o
                          | "+Masc":o "+Plural":s
                          ] "+Dem":0;

define Pronombre [Personal "+Pers":0 | Posesivo "+Pos":0 | PDemostrativo] "+Pron":0;

# Open class variant words
# ========================
# Open class variant words exhibit a more regular morphology than other parts of
# the language. The lexemes are listed in the dictionary, and they can take
# gender and number information. They are adjectives (Adjetivos) and nouns
# (Sustantivos).

# Adjetivos
define Adjetivo @txt"data/ES/OP/Adj.txt" GenNum "+Adj":0;

# Sustantivos
define Sustantivo @txt"data/ES/OP/Sust.txt" GenNum "+Sust":0;

# Verbs
# -----
# Verbs in romance languages are quite complex, and in Spanish it is indeed so.
# They merit their own script, which is sourced here. See its documentation
# [here](verbs.ES.html).
source src/verbs.ES.foma
define Verbo;

# Lexicon
# =======
# The lexicon is just the possible words that we are going to recognize, with
# the corresponding suffixes appended.
define Lexicon Determinante
             | Pronombre
             | Adjetivo
             | Sustantivo
             | Verbo
             ;

# Ortographic rules
# -----------------
# The lexicon is then passed through ortographic rewrite rules, which take care
# of morpheme boundary phenomena. These are quite more regular in Spanish than
# in English. A few are listed here, but a linguist would be required to make an
# exhaustive list. Do note that verb rewrite rules are apart, in the
# corresponding script, since they are quite more complex.
regex Lexicon
  .o. [..] -> e || Cons _ %^ s
  .o. z -> c || _ %^ [e|i]
  .o. o -> 0 || _ %^ a
  .o. %^ -> 0;

# Diacritic flags are used in the verb subsystem, and here we compute the
# equivalent transducer without flags, so that lookup can use it.
eliminate flags
